Alaska statutes. Title 18. Health, Safety, Housing, Human Rights, and Public Defender.
Article 12. Stalking and Sexual Assault Protective Orders and Notification to Stalking and Sexual Assault Victims.

Cross references. —

For the effect of AS

18.65.850

—

18.65.870

on Rule 65, Alaska Rules of Civil Procedure, see § 8, ch. 87, SLA 2003, in the 2003 Temporary and Special Acts and § 12, ch. 36, SLA 2006 in the 2006 Temporary and Special Acts.

Sec. 18.65.850.
Protective orders for stalking and sexual assault.

A person who reasonably believes that the person is a victim of stalking or sexual assault that is not a crime involving domestic violence may file a petition in the district or superior court for a protective order against a respondent who is alleged to have committed the stalking or sexual assault. A parent or guardian may file a petition on behalf of a minor.

When a petition for a protective order is filed, the court shall schedule a hearing and provide at least 10 days’ notice to the respondent of the hearing and of the respondent’s right to appear and be heard, either in person or through an attorney. If the court finds by a preponderance of evidence that the respondent has committed stalking or sexual assault against the petitioner, regardless of whether the respondent appears at the hearing, the court may order any relief available under (c) of this section. The provisions of a protective order issued under this section are effective for one year unless earlier dissolved by the court.

A protective order issued under this section may

prohibit the respondent from threatening to commit or committing stalking or sexual assault;

prohibit the respondent from telephoning, contacting, or otherwise communicating directly or indirectly with the petitioner or a designated household member of the petitioner specifically named by the court;

direct the respondent to stay away from the residence, school, or place of employment of the petitioner, or any specified place frequented by the petitioner; however, the court may order the respondent to stay away from the respondent’s own residence, school, or place of employment only if the respondent has been provided actual notice of the opportunity to appear and be heard on the petition;

order other relief the court determines to be necessary to protect the petitioner or the designated household member.

If the court issues a protective order under this section, the court shall

make reasonable efforts to ensure that the order is understood by the petitioner and by the respondent, if present; and

have the order delivered to the appropriate local law enforcement agency for expedited service.

A court may not deny a petition for a protective order solely because

there is a lapse of time between an act of sexual assault and the filing of the petition;

the stalking or act of sexual assault was the basis for a previous protective order; or

a court previously found that the petitioner was a victim of stalking or sexual assault but declined to order relief under this section, if the petition alleges a change in circumstances since the court’s previous finding.

Within 30 days before, or within 60 days after, the expiration of a protective order issued or extended under this section, a petitioner may petition the court for an extension of the protective order. The court shall schedule a hearing and provide at least 10 days’ notice to the respondent of the hearing and of the respondent’s right to appear and be heard, either in person or through an attorney. If the court finds that an extension of the provisions of the order is necessary to protect the petitioner from stalking or sexual assault, regardless of whether the respondent appears at the hearing, the court may extend the provisions of the order. An extension granted under this subsection is effective for one year unless earlier dissolved by court order. If the court grants an extension before the protective order expires, the extension takes effect on the day the protective order would have expired.

History.

(§ 5 ch 87 SLA 2003; am §§ 4 — 7 ch 36 SLA 2006; am §§
1 — 3 ch 7 SLA 2019)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2019 amendment, effective September 8, 2019, in (b), substituted “effective for one year” for “effective for six months” in the last sentence; in (e), added (e)(2) and (3) and made related and stylistic changes; added (f).

Editor's notes. —

Under sec. 6, ch. 7, SLA 2019, the 2019 amendment of (e) of this section and enactment of (f) of this section applies “to protective orders issued before, on, or after September 8, 2019.”

Sec. 18.65.855.
Ex parte and emergency protective orders for stalking and sexual assault.

A person who reasonably believes that the person is a victim of stalking or sexual assault that is not a crime involving domestic violence may file a petition under AS

18.65.850

and request an ex parte protective order. If the court finds that the petition establishes probable cause that the crime of stalking or sexual assault has occurred, that it is necessary to protect the petitioner from further stalking or sexual assault, and that the petitioner has certified to the court in writing the efforts, if any, that have been made to provide notice to the respondent, the court shall ex parte and without notice to the respondent issue a protective order. An ex parte protective order under this section may grant the protection allowed by AS

18.65.850(c)

. An ex parte protective order expires 20 days after it is issued unless dissolved earlier by the court at the request of either the petitioner or the respondent after notice and, if requested, a hearing. If the court issues an ex parte protective order, the court shall have the order delivered to the appropriate law enforcement agency for expedited service.

A peace officer, on behalf of and with the consent of a victim of stalking or sexual assault that is not a crime involving domestic violence, may request an emergency protective order from a judicial officer. The request may be made orally or in writing based on the sworn statement of a peace officer, and in person or by telephone. If the court finds probable cause to believe that the petitioner is in immediate danger of stalking or sexual assault based on an allegation of the recent commission of stalking or sexual assault, the court ex parte shall issue an emergency protective order. An emergency protective order may grant the protection allowed by AS

18.65.850(c)

. An emergency protective order expires 72 hours after it is issued unless dissolved earlier by the court at the request of the petitioner. A peace officer who obtains an emergency protective order under this section shall

place the provisions of an oral order in writing on a form provided by the court and file the written order with the issuing court by the end of the judicial day after the order is issued;

provide a copy of the order to the petitioner; and

serve a copy of the order on the respondent.

History.

(§ 5 ch 87 SLA 2003; am § 8 ch 36 SLA 2006)

Sec. 18.65.860.
Modification of protective orders for stalking and sexual assault.

Either the petitioner or the respondent may request modification of a protective order issued under AS

18.65.850

or

18.65.855(a)

. If a request is made for modification of

a protective order, after notice and hearing under AS

18.65.850

, the court shall schedule a hearing within 20 days after the date the request is made, except that, if the court finds that the request is meritless on its face, the court may deny the request without a hearing; or

an ex parte protective order under AS

18.65.855(a)

, the court shall schedule a hearing on three days’ notice or on shorter notice as the court may prescribe.

If the court modifies a protective order under this section, the court shall issue a modified order and shall

make reasonable efforts to ensure that the order is understood by the petitioner and by the respondent, if present at the hearing; and

have the order delivered to the appropriate local law enforcement agency for expedited service.

History.

(§ 5 ch 87 SLA 2003)

Sec. 18.65.865.
Service of process; forms for petitions and orders; fees; warnings; notification; and pending civil or criminal actions.

Service of process of an order issued by the court under AS

18.65.850

—

18.65.860

shall be as provided in AS

18.66.160

for service of process of domestic violence protective orders.

The Alaska Court System shall prepare forms for petitions and protective orders and instructions for their use by a person seeking a protective order under AS

18.65.850

—

18.65.860

. The forms must conform to the Alaska Rules of Civil Procedure, except that information on the forms may be filled in by legible handwriting. Filing fees may not be charged in any action seeking only the relief provided in AS

18.65.850

-

18.65.870

. Each protective order form must contain the following warning in boldface type: “Violation of this order may be a misdemeanor, punishable by up to one year of incarceration and a fine of up to $25,000.”

The Department of Public Safety shall develop and make available to law enforcement agencies in the state a notice that details the rights of victims of stalking and sexual assault and the services available to them. The form must be similar to that provided to victims of domestic violence under AS

18.65.520

. A peace officer investigating a stalking or sexual assault offense shall provide the form to the victim.

In addition to other information required, a petition for a protective order must include a statement of pending civil and criminal actions involving either the petitioner or the respondent, if known. While a protective order is in effect or a petition for a protective order is pending, both the petitioner and respondent have a continuing duty to inform the court of pending civil and criminal actions involving either the petitioner or the respondent, if known.

History.

(§ 5 ch 87 SLA 2003; am §§ 9, 10 ch 36 SLA 2006; am § 26 ch 43 SLA 2013; am § 16 ch 13 SLA 2017)

Cross references. —

For the effect of this section on Rule 4, Alaska Rules of Civil Procedure, and Rule 9, Alaska Rules of Administration, see § 8, ch. 87, SLA 2003, in the 2003 Temporary and Special Acts.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2017 amendment, effective June 20, 2017, in the last sentence of (b), substituted “$25,000” for “$10,000”.

Sec. 18.65.867.
Enforcement and recognition of protective orders issued in other jurisdictions.

A protective order issued in another jurisdiction has the same effect and must be recognized and enforced in the same manner as a protective order issued by a court of this state if the protective order is

issued by a court of the United States, a court of another state or territory, a United States military tribunal, or a tribal court;

related to stalking or sexual assault that is not a crime involving domestic violence; and

entitled to full faith and credit under 18 U.S.C. 2265.

A protective order issued in another jurisdiction that appears authentic on its face is presumed valid.

History.

(§ 17 ch 13 SLA 2017)

Effective dates. —

Section 17,
ch. 13, SLA 2017, which enacted this section, took effect on September 17, 2017.

Sec. 18.65.870.
Definitions.

In AS

18.65.850

—

18.65.870

,

“crime involving domestic violence” has the meaning given in AS

18.66.990

;

“household member” has the meaning given in AS

18.66.990

;

“sexual assault” has the meaning given in AS

18.66.990

;

“stalking” means a violation of AS

11.41.260

or

11.41.270

.

History.

(§ 5 ch 87 SLA 2003; am § 11 ch 36 SLA 2006)

Revisor’s notes. —

Paragraph (3) was enacted as paragraph (4) and renumbered in 2006, at which time existing paragraph (3) was renumbered as paragraph (4).